Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.840

Grants or financing.

For the purposes of implementing chapter 163, Law of 2009, the department may seek grants or financing from the federal government, industry, or philanthropists.

[ 2009 c 163 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 163: See note following RCW 43.30.835.